Utah statutes.
51-8-303.   Requirements of member institutions of the state system of
higher education.
(1)  The State Board of Regents shall:
(a)  establish asset allocations for the institutional funds;
(b)  in consultation with the commissioner of higher education, establish
guidelines for investing the funds; and
(c)  establish a written policy governing conflicts of interest.
(2) (a)  A higher education institution may not invest its institutional funds
in violation of the State Board of Regents' guidelines unless the State Board
of Regents approves an investment policy that has been adopted by the higher
education institution's board of trustees.
(b)  A higher education institution and its employees shall comply with the
State Board of Regents' conflict of interest requirements unless the State
Board of Regents approves the conflict of interest policy that has been
adopted by the higher education institution's board of trustees.
(3) (a)  The board of trustees of a higher education institution may adopt:
(i)  an investment policy to govern the investment of the higher education
institution's institutional funds; and
(ii)  a conflict of interest policy.
(b)  The investment policy shall:
(i)  define the groups, and the responsibilities of those groups, that must be
involved with investing the institutional funds;
(ii)  ensure that the groups defined under Subsection (3)(b)(i) at least
include the board of trustees, an investment committee, institutional staff,
and a custodian bank;
(iii)  create an investment committee that includes not more than two members
of the board of trustees and no less than two independent investment
management professionals;
(iv)  determine an appropriate risk level for the institutional funds;
(v)  establish allocation ranges for asset classes considered suitable for the
institutional funds;
(vi)  determine prudent diversification of the institutional funds; and
(vii)  establish performance objectives and a regular review process.
(c)  Each higher education institution that adopts an investment policy, a
conflict of interest policy, or both, shall submit the policy, and any
subsequent amendments, to the State Board of Regents for its approval.
(4)  Each higher education institution shall make monthly reports detailing
the deposit and investment of funds in its custody or control to:
(a)  its board of trustees; and
(b)  the State Board of Regents.
(5)  The state auditor may conduct or cause to be conducted an annual audit of
the investment program of each higher education institution.
(6)  The State Board of Regents shall submit an annual report to the governor
and the Legislature summarizing all investments by higher education
institutions under its jurisdiction.
